Hawaii, session 2026, HB1748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that heart disease remains one of the leading causes of death in Hawaii and across the United States, driven in large part by poor diet and inadequate physical activity.  Nutrition plays a central role in the development and progression of chronic diseases.  Diets high in processed foods and low in whole, nutrient‑dense options significantly increase the risk of heart disease, type 2 diabetes, obesity, and even certain cancers. The legislature believes that in Hawaii, diet‑related health challenges are especially evident.  Approximately twenty‑five per cent of residents are classified as obese, and about ten per cent live with diabetes.  These high rates of chronic disease place substantial strain on both individuals and the health care system. The legislature further finds that, despite the well‑established connection between nutrition and health, physicians typically receive very limited formal training in nutrition during medical school.  This gap leaves many future physicians underprepared to counsel patients on preventive lifestyle measures that are rooted in evidence‑based dietary guidance. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the university of Hawaii's John A. Burns school of medicine to establish a comprehensive, evidence‑based nutrition and metabolic health curriculum for medical students.  With this training, physicians will be better equipped to prevent chronic diseases and improve long‑term health outcomes for Hawaii residents. SECTION 2.  Chapter 304A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV, subpart L, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§304A-     John A. Burns school of medicine; nutrition and metabolic health curriculum.  (a)  The board shall establish and implement an evidence-based nutrition and metabolic health curriculum. (b)  Beginning on a date established by the board, completion of the nutrition and metabolic health curriculum shall be a requirement to earn a doctor of medicine degree. (c) The nutrition and metabolic health curriculum shall: (1)  Include nutrition counseling competencies; (2)  Include information on the role of nutrition in preventing and managing chronic disease; (3)  Require a minimum of twenty-five contact hours, or the equivalent, of nutrition education, which may be satisfied through a standalone course or as part of an integrated curriculum; and (4)  Satisfy minimum instructional standards and learning outcomes. (d)  As used in this section, "board" means the board of regents of the university of Hawaii." SECTION 3. No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028, the university of Hawaii shall submit a report to the legislature on the status of the nutrition and metabolic health curriculum.  The report shall contain: (1)  A summary of the curriculum and the ways in which it will be taught; (2)  The total number of required contact hours or the equivalent under section 304A-   (c)(3), Hawaii Revised Statutes; (3)  The methods that will be used to assess student competency; and (4)  A timeline for implementation, including the first cohort that will be required to complete the curriculum. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________